sl-SI: Vrsta traku za plavuti: Prilagodljiv trak z zaponko; Elastičen trak; Vrvica; Fiksen trak; Ježek; Trak z zaponko za hitro odpenjanje; Gumijast trak z zaponko; Vzmetni trak; Brez traku (zaprta peta); Drugo
en: Fin strap type: Adjustable buckle strap; Bungee strap; Drawstring; Fixed strap; Hook and loop; Quick release buckle strap; Rubber buckle strap; Spring strap; Strapless (full foot); Other
nl: Type vinband: Verstelbare gespband; Bungeeband; Trekkoord; Vaste band; Klittenband; Gespband met snelsluiting; Rubberen gespband; Veerband; Zonder band (gesloten hiel); Overige
sv: Hakremstyp: Justerbar rem med spänne; Bungee-rem; Dragsko; Fast rem; Kardborreband; Rem med snabbspänne; Gummirem med spänne; Fjäderrem; Utan rem (hel fot); Övrigt
de: Flossenbandtyp: Verstellbarer Schnallenriemen; Bungee-Riemen; Kordelzug; Fester Riemen; Klettverschluss; Schnellverschluss-Schnallenriemen; Gummischnallenriemen; Federriemen; Ohne Riemen (ganzer Fuß); Sonstige
ko: 핀 스트랩 유형: 조절형 버클 스트랩; 번지 스트랩; 드로스트링; 고정형 스트랩; 훅 앤 루프; 퀵 릴리스 버클 스트랩; 고무 버클 스트랩; 스프링 스트랩; 스트랩리스(풀 풋); 기타
tr: Palet kayışı tipi: Ayarlanabilir tokalı kayış; Esnek kordonlu kayış; Büzme ipli; Sabit kayış; Cırt cırtlı; Hızlı açılan tokalı kayış; Kauçuk tokalı kayış; Yaylı kayış; Kayışsız (tam ayak); Diğer
ja: フィンストラップタイプ: 調節可能なバックルストラップ; バンジーストラップ; ドローストリング; 固定ストラップ; 面ファスナー; クイックリリースバックルストラップ; ラバーバックルストラップ; スプリングストラップ; ストラップレス (フルフット); その他
fr: Type de sangle d'aileron: Sangle à boucle réglable; Sangle élastique; Cordon de serrage; Sangle fixe; Bande auto-agrippante; Sangle à boucle à dégagement rapide; Sangle à boucle en caoutchouc; Sangle à ressort; Sans sangle (chaussante); Autre
es: Tipo de correa de aleta: Correa con hebilla ajustable; Correa elástica; Cordón ajustable; Correa fija; Cierre de gancho y bucle; Correa con hebilla de liberación rápida; Correa con hebilla de goma; Correa de resorte; Sin correa (pie completo); Otro
vi: Loại dây đeo chân vịt: Dây đeo có khóa điều chỉnh; Dây đeo co giãn; Dây rút; Dây đeo cố định; Băng gai dính; Dây đeo có khóa tháo nhanh; Dây đeo khóa cao su; Dây đeo lò xo; Không dây (kín gót); Khác
da: Finnesnørretype: Justerbar spænderem; Elastikrem; Snoretræk; Fast rem; Burrebånd; Spænderem med lynudløser; Spænderem af gummi; Fjederrem; Uden rem (hel fod); Andet
pl: Styl paska do płetwy: Regulowany pasek z klamrą; Pasek typu bungee; Ściągacz sznurkowy; Stały pasek; Rzep; Pasek z klamrą zatrzaskową; Gumowy pasek z klamrą; Pasek sprężynowy; Bez paska (kaloszowe); Inny
nb: Stroppetype for finne: Justerbar spennestropp; Strikkstropp; Snøring; Fast stropp; Borrelås; Spennestropp med hurtigutløser; Spennestropp i gummi; Fjærstropp; Uten stropp (hel fot); Annet
zh-TW: 蛙鞋帶類型: 可調式扣帶; 彈力帶; 抽繩; 固定帶; 魔鬼氈; 快拆式扣帶; 橡膠扣帶; 彈簧帶; 無帶式 (全包腳); 其他
lt-LT: Peleko dirželio tipas: Reguliuojamas dirželis su sagtimi; Elastinis dirželis; Užtraukiamas raištelis; Fiksuotas dirželis; Kibioji juosta; Greito atsegimo dirželis su sagtimi; Guminis dirželis su sagtimi; Spyruoklinis dirželis; Be dirželių (pilna pėda); Kita
el: Τύπος ιμάντα πτερυγίου: Ρυθμιζόμενος ιμάντας με αγκράφα; Ελαστικός ιμάντας (bungee); Κορδόνι περίσφιξης; Σταθερός ιμάντας; Αυτοκόλλητη ταινία (hook and loop); Ιμάντας με αγκράφα γρήγορης απασφάλισης; Λαστιχένιος ιμάντας με αγκράφα; Ιμάντας με ελατήριο; Χωρίς ιμάντα (κλειστού τύπου); Άλλο
cs: Typ uchycení ploutve: Nastavitelný pásek s přezkou; Bungee pásek; Stahovací šňůrka; Pevný pásek; Suchý zip; Pásek s rychloupínací přezkou; Gumový pásek s přezkou; Pružinový pásek; Bez pásku (botičkové ploutve); Jiné
pt-BR: Tipo de tira da quilha: Tira com fivela ajustável; Tira elástica; Cordão de ajuste; Tira fixa; Fecho de contato; Tira com fivela de liberação rápida; Tira com fivela de borracha; Tira de mola; Sem tira (pé inteiro); Outros
pt-PT: Tipo de cinta da quilha: Tira com fivela ajustável; Tira elástica; Cordão; Tira fixa; Fita autoaderente; Tira com fivela de libertação rápida; Tira de borracha com fivela; Tira de mola; Sem tiras (pé inteiro); Outro
sk-SK: Typ remienka plutvy: Nastaviteľný popruh s prackou; Pružný popruh (Bungee); Sťahovacia šnúrka; Pevný popruh; Suchý zips; Popruh s rýchloupínacou prackou; Gumený popruh s prackou; Pružinový popruh; Bez popruhov (celá noha); Iné
hu: Uszonypánt típusa: Állítható csatos pánt; Bungee pánt; Húzózsinór; Rögzített pánt; Tépőzár; Gyorskioldós csatos pánt; Gumis csatos pánt; Rugós pánt; Pánt nélküli (zárt); Egyéb
fi: Evän hihnan tyyppi: Säädettävä solkihihna; Joustava hihna; Kiristysnauha; Kiinteä hihna; Tarranauha; Pikalukollinen solkihihna; Kumisolkihihna; Jousihihna; Hihnaton (umpikanta); Muu
bg-BG: Тип каишка за финки: Регулируема каишка с катарама; Бънджи каишка; Връзка за пристягане; Фиксирана каишка; Велкро; Каишка с бързо освобождаваща се катарама; Гумена каишка с катарама; Каишка с пружина; Без каишка (за цяло стъпало); Други
zh-CN: 脚蹼绑带类型: 可调节搭扣带; 弹力带; 抽绳; 固定带; 魔术贴; 快拆搭扣带; 橡胶搭扣带; 弹簧带; 无带（套脚式）; 其他
it: Tipo di cinturino per pinna: Cinturino con fibbia regolabile; Cinghiolo elastico; Coulisse; Cinturino fisso; Chiusura a strappo; Cinturino con fibbia a sgancio rapido; Cinturino con fibbia in gomma; Cinghiolo a molla; Senza cinturino (scarpetta chiusa); Altro
ro-RO: Tipul curelei înotătoarei: Curea cu cataramă ajustabilă; Curea elastică; Șnur; Curea fixă; Scai (Velcro); Curea cu cataramă cu eliberare rapidă; Curea de cauciuc cu cataramă; Curea cu arc; Fără curea (pentru tot piciorul); Altele
ru: Тип ремня плавника: Регулируемый ремешок с пряжкой; Эластичный ремешок; Шнурок; Фиксированный ремешок; Липучка; Ремешок с быстросъемной пряжкой; Резиновый ремешок с пряжкой; Пружинный ремешок; Без ремешка (закрытая пятка); Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta remena peraje: Prilagodljivi remen s kopčom; Elastični remen; Vezica; Fiksni remen; Na čičak; Remen s kopčom za brzo otpuštanje; Gumeni remen s kopčom; Remen s oprugom; Bez remena (puno stopalo); Ostalo
th: ประเภทสายรัดฟิน: สายรัดแบบหัวเข็มขัดปรับได้; สายรัดบันจี้; เชือกรูด; สายรัดแบบคงที่; แถบตีนตุ๊กแก; สายรัดแบบหัวเข็มขัดปลดเร็ว; สายรัดแบบหัวเข็มขัดยาง; สายรัดแบบสปริง; ไม่มีสายรัด (แบบสวมเต็มเท้า); อื่นๆ